Washington statutes.
RCW 18.29.053

Expanded function dental auxiliary services—Supervision.

A person who holds a license under this chapter and who has met the requirements under RCW 18.260.050 and has been issued a license to practice as an expanded function dental auxiliary may perform those expanded function dental auxiliary services identified in RCW 18.260.070 under the specified supervision of a supervising dentist.

[ 2007 c 269 s 14.]

NOTES:

Application—Implementation—2007 c 269: See RCW 18.260.900 and 18.260.901.